Illinois, session 104th, SB116.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Sections 2A-1.2, 10-6, 10-9, 22-1, and 22-7 and by adding 6Section 2A-56 as follows: 7    (10 ILCS 5/2A-1.2)  (from Ch. 46, par. 2A-1.2)8    Sec. 2A-1.2. Consolidated schedule of elections; offices 9designated. 10    (a) At the general election in the appropriate 11even-numbered years, the following offices shall be filled or 12shall be on the ballot as otherwise required by this Code:13        (1) Elector of President and Vice President of the 14    United States.15        (2) United States Senator and United States 16    Representative.17        (3) State Executive Branch elected officers.18        (4) State Senator and State Representative.19        (5) County elected officers, including State's 20    Attorney, County Board member, County Commissioners, and 21    elected President of the County Board or County Chief 22    Executive.23        (6) Circuit Court Clerk.  SB0116- 2 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1        (7) Regional Superintendent of Schools, except in 2    counties or educational service regions in which that 3    office has been abolished.4        (8) Judges of the Supreme, Appellate and Circuit 5    Courts, on the question of retention, to fill vacancies 6    and newly created judicial offices.7        (9) (Blank).8        (10) Trustee of the Metropolitan Water Reclamation 9    District of Greater Chicago, and elected Trustee of other 10    Sanitary Districts.11        (11) Special District elected officers, not otherwise 12    designated in this Section, where the statute creating or 13    authorizing the creation of the district requires an 14    annual election and permits or requires election of 15    candidates of political parties.16        (12) Beginning with the 2024 general election, the 17    elected members of the Chicago Board of Education; the 18    election of members of the Chicago Board of Education 19    shall be a nonpartisan election as provided for under this 20    Code and may be conducted on a separate ballot. 21        (13) Beginning on November 7, 2028, 5 members of the 22    State Board of Education. 23    (b) At the general primary election:24        (1) in each even-numbered year candidates of political 25    parties shall be nominated for those offices to be filled 26    at the general election in that year, except where   SB0116- 3 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1    pursuant to law nomination of candidates of political 2    parties is made by caucus.3        (2) in the appropriate even-numbered years the 4    political party offices of State central committeeperson, 5    township committeeperson, ward committeeperson, and 6    precinct committeeperson shall be filled and delegates and 7    alternate delegates to the National nominating conventions 8    shall be elected as may be required pursuant to this Code. 9    In the even-numbered years in which a Presidential 10    election is to be held, candidates in the Presidential 11    preference primary shall also be on the ballot.12        (3) in each even-numbered year, where the municipality 13    has provided for annual elections to elect municipal 14    officers pursuant to Section 6(f) or Section 7 of Article 15    VII of the Constitution, pursuant to the Illinois 16    Municipal Code or pursuant to the municipal charter, the 17    offices of such municipal officers shall be filled at an 18    election held on the date of the general primary election, 19    provided that the municipal election shall be a 20    nonpartisan election where required by the Illinois 21    Municipal Code. For partisan municipal elections in 22    even-numbered years, a primary to nominate candidates for 23    municipal office to be elected at the general primary 24    election shall be held on the Tuesday 6 weeks preceding 25    that election.26        (4) in each school district which has adopted the   SB0116- 4 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1    provisions of Article 33 of the School Code, successors to 2    the members of the board of education whose terms expire 3    in the year in which the general primary is held shall be 4    elected.5    (c) At the consolidated election in the appropriate 6odd-numbered years, the following offices shall be filled:7        (1) Municipal officers, provided that in 8    municipalities in which candidates for alderperson or 9    other municipal office are not permitted by law to be 10    candidates of political parties, the runoff election where 11    required by law, or the nonpartisan election where 12    required by law, shall be held on the date of the 13    consolidated election; and provided further, in the case 14    of municipal officers provided for by an ordinance 15    providing the form of government of the municipality 16    pursuant to Section 7 of Article VII of the Constitution, 17    such offices shall be filled by election or by runoff 18    election as may be provided by such ordinance;19        (2) Village and incorporated town library directors;20        (3) City boards of stadium commissioners;21        (4) Commissioners of park districts;22        (5) Trustees of public library districts;23        (6) Special District elected officers, not otherwise 24    designated in this Section, where the statute creating or 25    authorizing the creation of the district permits or 26    requires election of candidates of political parties;  SB0116- 5 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1        (7) Township officers, including township park 2    commissioners, township library directors, and boards of 3    managers of community buildings, and Multi-Township 4    Assessors;5        (8) Highway commissioners and road district clerks;6        (9) Members of school boards in school districts which 7    adopt Article 33 of the School Code;8        (10) The directors and chair of the Chain O Lakes - Fox 9    River Waterway Management Agency;10        (11) Forest preserve district commissioners elected 11    under Section 3.5 of the Downstate Forest Preserve 12    District Act;13        (12) Elected members of school boards, school 14    trustees, directors of boards of school directors, 15    trustees of county boards of school trustees (except in 16    counties or educational service regions having a 17    population of 2,000,000 or more inhabitants) and members 18    of boards of school inspectors, except school boards in 19    school districts that adopt Article 33 of the School Code;20        (13) Members of Community College district boards;21        (14) Trustees of Fire Protection Districts;22        (15) Commissioners of the Springfield Metropolitan 23    Exposition and Auditorium Authority;24        (16) Elected Trustees of Tuberculosis Sanitarium 25    Districts;26        (17) Elected Officers of special districts not   SB0116- 6 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1    otherwise designated in this Section for which the law 2    governing those districts does not permit candidates of 3    political parties.4    (d) At the consolidated primary election in each 5odd-numbered year, candidates of political parties shall be 6nominated for those offices to be filled at the consolidated 7election in that year, except where pursuant to law nomination 8of candidates of political parties is made by caucus, and 9except those offices listed in paragraphs (12) through (17) of 10subsection (c).11    At the consolidated primary election in the appropriate 12odd-numbered years, the mayor, clerk, treasurer, and 13alderpersons shall be elected in municipalities in which 14candidates for mayor, clerk, treasurer, or alderperson are not 15permitted by law to be candidates of political parties, 16subject to runoff elections to be held at the consolidated 17election as may be required by law, and municipal officers 18shall be nominated in a nonpartisan election in municipalities 19in which pursuant to law candidates for such office are not 20permitted to be candidates of political parties.21    At the consolidated primary election in the appropriate 22odd-numbered years, municipal officers shall be nominated or 23elected, or elected subject to a runoff, as may be provided by 24an ordinance providing a form of government of the 25municipality pursuant to Section 7 of Article VII of the 26Constitution.  SB0116- 7 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1    (e) (Blank). 2    (f) At any election established in Section 2A-1.1, public 3questions may be submitted to voters pursuant to this Code and 4any special election otherwise required or authorized by law 5or by court order may be conducted pursuant to this Code.6    Notwithstanding the regular dates for election of officers 7established in this Article, whenever a referendum is held for 8the establishment of a political subdivision whose officers 9are to be elected, the initial officers shall be elected at the 10election at which such referendum is held if otherwise so 11provided by law. In such cases, the election of the initial 12officers shall be subject to the referendum.13    Notwithstanding the regular dates for election of 14officials established in this Article, any community college 15district which becomes effective by operation of law pursuant 16to Section 6-6.1 of the Public Community College Act, as now or 17hereafter amended, shall elect the initial district board 18members at the next regularly scheduled election following the 19effective date of the new district.20    (g) At any election established in Section 2A-1.1, if in 21any precinct there are no offices or public questions required 22to be on the ballot under this Code then no election shall be 23held in the precinct on that date.24    (h) There may be conducted a referendum in accordance with 25the provisions of Division 6-4 of the Counties Code.26(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21; 102-177, eff. 6-1-22;   SB0116- 8 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-691, eff. 12-17-21.) 2    (10 ILCS 5/2A-56 new)3    Sec. 2A-56. State Board of Education; time of election. 4Five members of the State Board of Education shall be elected 5at the general election in 2028 and at the general election 6every 4 years thereafter. 7    (10 ILCS 5/10-6)  (from Ch. 46, par. 10-6)8    Sec. 10-6. Time and manner of filing. Except as otherwise 9provided in this Code, certificates of nomination and 10nomination papers for the nomination of candidates for offices 11to be filled by electors of the entire State, or any district 12not entirely within a county, or for congressional, state 13legislative, or judicial offices, or elected members of the 14State Board of Education, shall be presented to the principal 15office of the State Board of Elections not more than 169 nor 16less than 162 days previous to the day of election for which 17the candidates are nominated. The State Board of Elections 18shall endorse the certificates of nomination or nomination 19papers, as the case may be, and the date and hour of 20presentment to it. Except as otherwise provided in this Code, 21all other certificates for the nomination of candidates shall 22be filed with the county clerk of the respective counties not 23more than 169 but at least 162 days previous to the day of such 24election. Certificates of nomination and nomination papers for   SB0116- 9 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1the nomination of candidates for school district offices to be 2filled at consolidated elections shall be filed with the 3county clerk or county board of election commissioners of the 4county in which the principal office of the school district is 5located not more than 141 nor less than 134 days before the 6consolidated election. Except as otherwise provided in this 7Code, certificates of nomination and nomination papers for the 8nomination of candidates for the other offices of political 9subdivisions to be filled at regular elections other than the 10general election shall be filed with the local election 11official of such subdivision:12        (1) (blank);13        (2) not more than 141 nor less than 134 days prior to 14    the consolidated election; or15        (3) not more than 141 nor less than 134 days prior to 16    the general primary in the case of municipal offices to be 17    filled at the general primary election; or18        (4) not more than 127 nor less than 120 days before the 19    consolidated primary in the case of municipal offices to 20    be elected on a nonpartisan basis pursuant to law 21    (including, without limitation, those municipal offices 22    subject to Articles 4 and 5 of the Municipal Code); or23        (5) not more than 141 nor less than 134 days before the 24    municipal primary in even numbered years for such 25    nonpartisan municipal offices where annual elections are 26    provided; or  SB0116- 10 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1        (6) in the case of petitions for the office of 2    multi-township assessor, such petitions shall be filed 3    with the election authority not more than 113 nor less 4    than 134 days before the consolidated election.5    However, where a political subdivision's boundaries are 6co-extensive with or are entirely within the jurisdiction of a 7municipal board of election commissioners, the certificates of 8nomination and nomination papers for candidates for such 9political subdivision offices shall be filed in the office of 10such Board.11(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21; 103-600, eff. 7-1-24.) 12    (10 ILCS 5/10-9)  (from Ch. 46, par. 10-9)13    Sec. 10-9. The following electoral boards are designated 14for the purpose of hearing and passing upon the objector's 15petition described in Section 10-8.16        1. The State Board of Elections will hear and pass 17    upon objections to the nominations of candidates for State 18    offices, nominations of candidates for the elected members 19    of the State Board of Education, nominations of candidates 20    for congressional or legislative offices that are in more 21    than one county or are wholly located within a single 22    county with a population of less than 3,000,000 and 23    judicial offices of districts, subcircuits, or circuits 24    situated in more than one county, nominations of 25    candidates for the offices of State's attorney or regional   SB0116- 11 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1    superintendent of schools to be elected from more than one 2    county, and petitions for proposed amendments to the 3    Constitution of the State of Illinois as provided for in 4    Section 3 of Article XIV of the Constitution.5        2. The county officers electoral board of a county 6    with a population of less than 3,000,000 to hear and pass 7    upon objections to the nominations of candidates for 8    county offices and judicial offices of a district, 9    subcircuit, or circuit coterminous with or less than a 10    county, for any school district offices, for the office of 11    multi-township assessor where candidates for such office 12    are nominated in accordance with this Code, and for all 13    special district offices, shall be composed of the county 14    clerk, or an assistant designated by the county clerk, the 15    State's attorney of the county or an Assistant State's 16    Attorney designated by the State's Attorney, and the clerk 17    of the circuit court, or an assistant designated by the 18    clerk of the circuit court, of the county, of whom the 19    county clerk or his designee shall be the chair, except 20    that in any county which has established a county board of 21    election commissioners that board shall constitute the 22    county officers electoral board ex-officio. If a school 23    district is located in 2 or more counties, the county 24    officers electoral board of the county in which the 25    principal office of the school district is located shall 26    hear and pass upon objections to nominations of candidates   SB0116- 12 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1    for school district office in that school district. 2        2.5. The county officers electoral board of a county 3    with a population of 3,000,000 or more to hear and pass 4    upon objections to the nominations of candidates for 5    county offices, candidates for congressional offices and 6    representatives in the General Assembly if the district is 7    wholly within a county with a population of 3,000,000 or 8    more, unless the district is wholly or partially within 9    the jurisdiction of a municipal board of election 10    commissioners, and judicial offices of a district, 11    subcircuit, or circuit coterminous with or less than a 12    county, for any school district offices, for the office of 13    multi-township assessor where candidates for such office 14    are nominated in accordance with this Code, for all 15    special district offices, and for candidates for the 16    Senate, shall be composed of the county clerk, or an 17    assistant designated by the county clerk, the State's 18    Attorney of the county or an Assistant State's Attorney 19    designated by the State's Attorney, and the clerk of the 20    circuit court, or an assistant designated by the clerk of 21    the circuit court, of the county, of whom the county clerk 22    or his designee shall be the chair, except that, in any 23    county which has established a county board of election 24    commissioners, that board shall constitute the county 25    officers electoral board ex-officio. If a school district 26    is located in 2 or more counties, the county officers   SB0116- 13 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1    electoral board of the county in which the principal 2    office of the school district is located shall hear and 3    pass upon objections to nominations of candidates for 4    school district office in that school district. 5        3. The municipal officers electoral board to hear and 6    pass upon objections to the nominations of candidates for 7    officers of municipalities shall be composed of the mayor 8    or president of the board of trustees of the city, village 9    or incorporated town, and the city, village or 10    incorporated town clerk, and one member of the city 11    council or board of trustees, that member being designated 12    who is eligible to serve on the electoral board and has 13    served the greatest number of years as a member of the city 14    council or board of trustees, of whom the mayor or 15    president of the board of trustees shall be the chair.16        4. The township officers electoral board to pass upon 17    objections to the nominations of township officers shall 18    be composed of the township supervisor, the town clerk, 19    and that eligible town trustee elected in the township who 20    has had the longest term of continuous service as town 21    trustee, of whom the township supervisor shall be the 22    chair.23        5. The education officers electoral board to hear and 24    pass upon objections to the nominations of candidates for 25    offices in community college districts shall be composed 26    of the presiding officer of the community college district   SB0116- 14 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1    board, who shall be the chair, the secretary of the 2    community college district board and the eligible elected 3    community college board member who has the longest term of 4    continuous service as a board member.5        6. In all cases, however, where the Congressional, 6    Legislative, or Representative district is wholly or 7    partially within the jurisdiction of a single municipal 8    board of election commissioners in Cook County and in all 9    cases where the school district or special district is 10    wholly within the jurisdiction of a municipal board of 11    election commissioners and in all cases where the 12    municipality or township is wholly or partially within the 13    jurisdiction of a municipal board of election 14    commissioners, the board of election commissioners shall 15    ex-officio constitute the electoral board.16    For special districts situated in more than one county, 17the county officers electoral board of the county in which the 18principal office of the district is located has jurisdiction 19to hear and pass upon objections. For purposes of this 20Section, "special districts" means all political subdivisions 21other than counties, municipalities, townships and school and 22community college districts.23    In the event that any member of the appropriate board is a 24candidate for the office with relation to which the objector's 25petition is filed, he shall not be eligible to serve on that 26board and shall not act as a member of the board and his place   SB0116- 15 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1shall be filled as follows:2        a. In the county officers electoral board by the 3    county treasurer, and if he or she is ineligible to serve, 4    by the sheriff of the county.5        b. In the municipal officers electoral board by the 6    eligible elected city council or board of trustees member 7    who has served the second greatest number of years as a 8    city council or board of trustees member.9        c. In the township officers electoral board by the 10    eligible elected town trustee who has had the second 11    longest term of continuous service as a town trustee.12        d. In the education officers electoral board by the 13    eligible elected community college district board member 14    who has had the second longest term of continuous service 15    as a board member.16    In the event that the chair of the electoral board is 17ineligible to act because of the fact that he or she is a 18candidate for the office with relation to which the objector's 19petition is filed, then the substitute chosen under the 20provisions of this Section shall be the chair; In this case, 21the officer or board with whom the objector's petition is 22filed, shall transmit the certificate of nomination or 23nomination papers as the case may be, and the objector's 24petition to the substitute chair of the electoral board.25    When 2 or more eligible individuals, by reason of their 26terms of service on a city council or board of trustees,   SB0116- 16 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1township board of trustees, or community college district 2board, qualify to serve on an electoral board, the one to serve 3shall be chosen by lot. 4    Any vacancies on an electoral board not otherwise filled 5pursuant to this Section shall be filled by public members 6appointed by the Chief Judge of the Circuit Court for the 7county wherein the electoral board hearing is being held upon 8notification to the Chief Judge of such vacancies. The Chief 9Judge shall be so notified by a member of the electoral board 10or the officer or board with whom the objector's petition was 11filed. In the event that none of the individuals designated by 12this Section to serve on the electoral board are eligible, the 13chair of an electoral board shall be designated by the Chief 14Judge.15(Source: P.A. 103-467, eff. 8-4-23.) 16    (10 ILCS 5/22-1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 22-1)17    Sec. 22-1. Abstracts of votes. Within 21 days after the 18close of the election at which candidates for offices 19hereinafter named in this Section are voted upon, the election 20authorities of the respective counties shall open the returns 21and make abstracts of the votes on a separate sheet for each of 22the following:23        A. For Governor and Lieutenant Governor;24        B. For State officers;25        C. For presidential electors;  SB0116- 17 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1        D. For United States Senators and Representatives to 2    Congress;3        E. For judges of the Supreme Court;4        F. For judges of the Appellate Court;5        G. For judges of the circuit court;6        H. For Senators and Representatives to the General 7    Assembly;8        I. For State's Attorneys elected from 2 or more 9    counties;10        J. For amendments to the Constitution, and for other 11    propositions submitted to the electors of the entire 12    State;13        K. For county officers and for propositions submitted 14    to the electors of the county only;15        L. For Regional Superintendent of Schools;16        M. For trustees of Sanitary Districts; and17        N. For Trustee of a Regional Board of School Trustees; 18    and .19        O. For elected members of the State Board of 20    Education. 21    Each sheet shall report the returns by precinct or ward.22    Multiple originals of each of the sheets shall be prepared 23and one of each shall be turned over to the chair of the county 24central committee of each of the then existing established 25political parties, as defined in Section 10-2, or his duly 26authorized representative immediately after the completion of   SB0116- 18 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1the entries on the sheets and before the totals have been 2compiled.3    The foregoing abstracts shall be preserved by the election 4authority in its office.5    Whenever any county clerk is unable to canvass the vote, 6the deputy county clerk or a designee of the county clerk shall 7serve in his or her place.8    The powers and duties of the election authority canvassing 9the votes are limited to those specified in this Section.10    No person who is shown by the election authority's 11proclamation to have been elected at the consolidated election 12or general election as a write-in candidate shall take office 13unless that person has first filed with the certifying office 14or board a statement of candidacy pursuant to Section 7-10 or 15Section 10-5, a statement pursuant to Section 7-10.1, and a 16receipt for filing a statement of economic interests in 17relation to the unit of government to which he or she has been 18elected. For officers elected at the consolidated election, 19the certifying officer shall notify the election authority of 20the receipt of those documents, and the county clerk shall 21issue the certification of election under the provisions of 22Section 22-18.23(Source: P.A. 100-1027, eff. 1-1-19.) 24    (10 ILCS 5/22-7)  (from Ch. 46, par. 22-7)25    Sec. 22-7. Canvass of votes; declaration and proclamation   SB0116- 19 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1of result. The State Board of Elections, shall proceed within 231 days after the election, and sooner if all the returns are 3received, to canvass the votes given for United States 4Senators and Representatives to Congress, State executive 5officers, elected members of the State Board of Education, 6judges of the Supreme Court, judges of the Appellate Court, 7judges of the Circuit Court, Senators, Representatives to the 8General Assembly, State's Attorneys and Regional 9Superintendents of Schools elected from 2 or more counties, 10respectively, and the persons having the highest number of 11votes for the respective offices shall be declared duly 12elected, but if it appears that more than the number of persons 13to be elected have the highest and an equal number of votes for 14the same office, the electoral board shall decide by lot which 15of such persons shall be elected; and to each person duly 16elected, the Governor shall give a certificate of election or 17commission, as the case may require, and shall cause 18proclamation to be made of the result of the canvass, and they 19shall at the same time and in the same manner, canvass the vote 20cast upon amendments to the Constitution, and upon other 21propositions submitted to the electors of the entire State; 22and the Governor shall cause to be made such proclamation of 23the result of the canvass as the statutes elsewhere provide. 24The State Board of Elections shall transmit to the State 25Comptroller a list of the persons elected to the various 26offices. The State Board of Elections shall also transmit to   SB0116- 20 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1the Supreme Court the names of persons elected to judgeships 2in adversary elections and the names of judges who fail to win 3retention in office.4    No person who is shown by the canvassing board's 5proclamation to have been elected at the consolidated election 6or general election as a write-in candidate shall take office 7unless that person has first filed with the certifying office 8or board a statement of candidacy pursuant to Section 7-10 or 9Section 10-5, a statement pursuant to Section 7-10.1, and a 10receipt for filing a statement of economic interests in 11relation to the unit of government to which he or she has been 12elected. For officers elected at the consolidated election, 13the certifying officer shall notify the election authority of 14the receipt of those documents, and the county clerk shall 15issue the certification of election under the provisions of 16Section 22-18. 17(Source: P.A. 93-847, eff. 7-30-04; 94-645, eff. 8-22-05.) 18    Section 10. The School Code is amended by changing 19Sections 1A-1, 1A-2, 1A-2.1, and 1A-4 as follows: 20    (105 ILCS 5/1A-1)  (from Ch. 122, par. 1A-1)21    Sec. 1A-1. Members and terms. 22    (a) (Blank).23    (b) The State Board of Education shall consist of 5 24members initially to be elected under this amendatory Act of   SB0116- 21 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1the 104th General Assembly and 8 appointed members and a 2chairperson, who shall be appointed by the Governor with the 3advice and consent of the Senate from a pattern of regional 4representation as follows: 2 appointees shall be selected from 5among those counties of the State other than Cook County and 6the 5 counties contiguous to Cook County, one of whom must 7represent the educator community; 2 appointees shall be 8selected from Cook County, one of whom shall be a resident of 9the City of Chicago and one of whom shall be a resident of that 10part of Cook County which lies outside the city limits of 11Chicago and of whom one must represent the educator community; 122 appointees shall be selected from among the 5 counties of the 13State that are contiguous to Cook County, one of whom must 14represent the educator community; and 3 members shall be 15selected as members-at-large (one of which shall be the 16chairperson). With respect to the educator community 17appointments, no more than one member may be employed as a 18district superintendent, principal, school business official, 19or teacher and no more than one may be employed by the same 20school district or school. The changes made to this Section by 21this amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly apply to 22appointments made after the effective date of this amendatory 23Act of the 100th General Assembly. The Governor who takes 24office on the second Monday of January after his or her 25election shall be the person who nominates members to fill 26vacancies whose terms begin after that date and before the   SB0116- 22 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1term of the next Governor begins.2    The term of each member of the State Board of Education 3whose term expires on January 12, 2005 shall instead terminate 4on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 93rd 5General Assembly. Of these 3 seats, (i) the member initially 6appointed pursuant to this amendatory Act of the 93rd General 7Assembly whose seat was vacant on April 27, 2004 shall serve 8until the second Wednesday of January, 2009 and (ii) the other 92 members initially appointed pursuant to this amendatory Act 10of the 93rd General Assembly shall serve until the second 11Wednesday of January, 2007.12    The term of the member of the State Board of Education 13whose seat was vacant on April 27, 2004 and whose term expires 14on January 10, 2007 shall instead terminate on the effective 15date of this amendatory Act of the 93rd General Assembly. The 16member initially appointed pursuant to this amendatory Act of 17the 93rd General Assembly to fill this seat shall be the 18chairperson and shall serve until the second Wednesday of 19January, 2007.20    The term of the member of the State Board of Education 21whose seat was vacant on May 28, 2004 but after April 27, 2004 22and whose term expires on January 10, 2007 shall instead 23terminate on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 2493rd General Assembly. The member initially appointed pursuant 25to this amendatory Act of the 93rd General Assembly to fill 26this seat shall serve until the second Wednesday of January,   SB0116- 23 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b12007. 2    The term of the other member of the State Board of 3Education whose term expires on January 10, 2007 shall instead 4terminate on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 593rd General Assembly. The member initially appointed pursuant 6to this amendatory Act of the 93rd General Assembly to fill 7this seat shall serve until the second Wednesday of January, 82007.9    The term of the member of the State Board of Education 10whose term expires on January 14, 2009 and who was selected 11from among the 5 counties of the State that are contiguous to 12Cook County and is a resident of Lake County shall instead 13terminate on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 1493rd General Assembly. The member initially appointed pursuant 15to this amendatory Act of the 93rd General Assembly to fill 16this seat shall serve until the second Wednesday of January, 172009.18    Upon expiration of the terms of the members initially 19appointed under this amendatory Act of the 93rd General 20Assembly and members whose terms were not terminated by this 21amendatory Act of the 93rd General Assembly, their respective 22successors shall be appointed for terms of 4 years, from the 23second Wednesday in January of each odd numbered year and 24until their respective successors are appointed and qualified. 25    (c) Of the 4 members, excluding the chairperson, whose 26terms expire on the second Wednesday of January, 2007 and   SB0116- 24 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1every 4 years thereafter, one of those members must be an 2at-large member and at no time may more than 2 of those members 3be from one political party. Of the 4 members whose terms 4expire on the second Wednesday of January, 2009 and every 4 5years thereafter, one of those members must be an at-large 6member and at no time may more than 2 of those members be from 7one political party. Party membership is defined as having 8voted in the primary of the party in the last primary before 9appointment. 10    (c-5) Five members of the State Board of Education shall 11be elected on a nonpartisan basis at the general election in 122028 and every 4 years thereafter. One member shall be elected 13from each of the judicial districts. A petition for nomination 14of a candidate for member of the State Board of Education shall 15be signed by at least 0.5% of the total number of registered 16voters in the judicial district in which the person is a 17candidate for nomination. Each of these members shall serve 18for a term of 4 years, from the second Wednesday of January 19until after the member's election and until the member's 20successor takes office. 21    (d) Vacancies in appointed terms shall be filled by 22appointment by the Governor with the advice and consent of the 23Senate for the extent of the unexpired term. If a vacancy in 24membership occurs at a time when the Senate is not in session, 25the Governor shall make a temporary appointment until the next 26meeting of the Senate, when the Governor shall appoint a   SB0116- 25 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1person to fill that membership for the remainder of its term. 2If the Senate is not in session when appointments for a full 3term are made, the appointments shall be made as in the case of 4vacancies.5    (d-5) Beginning on the date when all of the new members 6initially to be elected under this amendatory Act of the 104th 7General Assembly have taken office, vacancies in elected terms 8shall be filled by appointment and confirmed by the remaining 9members of the State Board of Education. A person selected to 10fill a vacancy left by an elected member must meet all 11eligibility requirements for the position. 12(Source: P.A. 100-1135, eff. 11-28-18.) 13    (105 ILCS 5/1A-2)  (from Ch. 122, par. 1A-2)14    Sec. 1A-2. Qualifications. In order to be a member The 15members of the State Board of Education, a person must be a 16citizen shall be citizens of the United States and a resident 17residents of the State of Illinois. To be an elected member, a 18person must also be a resident of the judicial district from 19which the person was elected. Appointed members and shall be 20selected as far as may be practicable on the basis of their 21knowledge of, or interest and experience in, problems of 22public education. No elected member of the State Board of 23Education may be employed by a public or nonpublic school; a 24college, including a community or junior college; a 25university; the State Board of Education; a regional office of   SB0116- 26 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1education; or any other educational institution. No elected 2member of the State Board of Education may be a member of the 3governing board of a school district or a charter or nonpublic 4school. No member of the State Board of Education shall 5benefit from funds provided by the State Board of Education to 6an institution of higher learning, public or private, within 7Illinois, nor shall members be school trustees of a public or 8nonpublic college, university or technical institution within 9Illinois. No member shall be appointed to more than 2 4-year 10terms. No member may be elected to more than 2 consecutive 114-year terms. Members shall be reimbursed for all ordinary and 12necessary expenses incurred in performing their duties as 13members of the Board. Expenses shall be approved by the Board 14and be consistent with the laws, policies, and requirements of 15the State of Illinois regarding such expenditures, plus any 16member may include in the member's his or her claim for 17expenses $50 per day for meeting days.18(Source: P.A. 100-1135, eff. 11-28-18.) 19    (105 ILCS 5/1A-2.1)  (from Ch. 122, par. 1A-2.1)20    Sec. 1A-2.1. Vacancies. The Governor may remove for 21incompetence, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office any 22member of the State Board of Education. A vacancy also exists 23on the State Board of Education when one or more of the 24following events occur:25        1. A member dies.  SB0116- 27 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1        2. A member files a written resignation with the 2    Governor.3        3. A member is adjudicated to be a person under legal 4    disability under the Probate Act of 1975 or a person 5    subject to involuntary admission under the Mental Health 6    and Developmental Disabilities Code.7        4. For appointed members, a A member ceases to be a 8    resident of the region from which the member he or she was 9    appointed.10        5. A member is convicted of an infamous crime or of any 11    offense involving a violation of his or her duties under 12    this Code.13        6. A member fails to maintain the qualifications 14    stated in Sections 1A-1 and 1A-2 of this Code.15(Source: P.A. 100-1135, eff. 11-28-18.) 16    (105 ILCS 5/1A-4)  (from Ch. 122, par. 1A-4)17    Sec. 1A-4. Powers and duties of the Board. 18    A. (Blank).19    B. The Board shall determine the qualifications of and 20appoint a chief education officer, to be known as the State 21Superintendent of Education, who may be proposed by the 22Governor and who shall serve at the pleasure of the Board and 23pursuant to a performance-based contract linked to statewide 24student performance and academic improvement within Illinois 25schools. Upon expiration or buyout of the contract of the   SB0116- 28 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1State Superintendent of Education in office on the effective 2date of this amendatory Act of the 93rd General Assembly, a 3State Superintendent of Education shall be appointed by a 4State Board of Education that includes the 7 new Board members 5who were appointed to fill seats of members whose terms were 6terminated on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 793rd General Assembly. Thereafter, a State Superintendent of 8Education must, at a minimum, be appointed at the beginning of 9each term of a Governor after that Governor has made 10appointments to the Board. A performance-based contract issued 11for the employment of a State Superintendent of Education 12entered into on or after the effective date of this amendatory 13Act of the 93rd General Assembly must expire no later than 14February 1, 2007, and subsequent contracts must expire no 15later than February 1 each 4 years thereafter. No contract 16shall be extended or renewed beyond February 1, 2007 and 17February 1 each 4 years thereafter, but a State Superintendent 18of Education shall serve until his or her successor is 19appointed. Each contract entered into on or before January 8, 202007 with a State Superintendent of Education must provide 21that the State Board of Education may terminate the contract 22for cause, and the State Board of Education shall not 23thereafter be liable for further payments under the contract. 24With regard to this amendatory Act of the 93rd General 25Assembly, it is the intent of the General Assembly that, 26beginning with the Governor who takes office on the second   SB0116- 29 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1Monday of January, 2007, a State Superintendent of Education 2be appointed at the beginning of each term of a Governor after 3that Governor has made appointments to the Board. The State 4Superintendent of Education shall not serve as a member of the 5State Board of Education. The Board shall set the compensation 6of the State Superintendent of Education who shall serve as 7the Board's chief executive officer. The Board shall also 8establish the duties, powers and responsibilities of the State 9Superintendent, which shall be included in the State 10Superintendent's performance-based contract along with the 11goals and indicators of student performance and academic 12improvement used to measure the performance and effectiveness 13of the State Superintendent. The State Board of Education may 14delegate to the State Superintendent of Education the 15authority to act on the Board's behalf, provided such 16delegation is made pursuant to adopted board policy or the 17powers delegated are ministerial in nature. The State Board 18may not delegate authority under this Section to the State 19Superintendent to (1) nonrecognize school districts, (2) 20withhold State payments as a penalty, or (3) make final 21decisions under the contested case provisions of the Illinois 22Administrative Procedure Act unless otherwise provided by law.23    C. The powers and duties of the State Board of Education 24shall encompass all duties delegated to the Office of 25Superintendent of Public Instruction on January 12, 1975, 26except as the law providing for such powers and duties is   SB0116- 30 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1thereafter amended, and such other powers and duties as the 2General Assembly shall designate. The Board shall be 3responsible for the educational policies and guidelines for 4public schools, pre-school through grade 12 and Vocational 5Education in the State of Illinois. Beginning July 1, 2024, 6educational policies and guidelines pertaining to pre-school 7and the Prevention Initiative program shall be done in 8consultation with the Department of Early Childhood. The Board 9shall analyze the present and future aims, needs, and 10requirements of education in the State of Illinois and 11recommend to the General Assembly the powers which should be 12exercised by the Board. The Board shall recommend the passage 13and the legislation necessary to determine the appropriate 14relationship between the Board and local boards of education 15and the various State agencies and shall recommend desirable 16modifications in the laws which affect schools. 17    D. Two members of the Board shall be appointed by the 18chairperson to serve on a standing joint Education Committee, 192 others shall be appointed from the Board of Higher 20Education, 2 others shall be appointed by the chairperson of 21the Illinois Community College Board, and 2 others shall be 22appointed by the chairperson of the Human Resource Investment 23Council. The Committee shall be responsible for making 24recommendations concerning the submission of any workforce 25development plan or workforce training program required by 26federal law or under any block grant authority. The Committee   SB0116- 31 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1will be responsible for developing policy on matters of mutual 2concern to elementary, secondary and higher education such as 3Occupational and Career Education, Teacher Preparation and 4Licensure, Educational Finance, Articulation between 5Elementary, Secondary and Higher Education and Research and 6Planning. The joint Education Committee shall meet at least 7quarterly and submit an annual report of its findings, 8conclusions, and recommendations to the State Board of 9Education, the Board of Higher Education, the Illinois 10Community College Board, the Human Resource Investment 11Council, the Governor, and the General Assembly. All meetings 12of this Committee shall be official meetings for reimbursement 13under this Act. On the effective date of this amendatory Act of 14the 95th General Assembly, the Joint Education Committee is 15abolished. 16    E. Until the 5 members initially to be elected under this 17amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly have taken 18office, 5 Five members of the Board shall constitute a quorum. 19Beginning on the date when the 5 members initially to be 20elected under this amendatory Act of the 104th General 21Assembly have taken office, a majority of the Board shall 22constitute a quorum. Until the 5 members initially to be 23elected under this amendatory Act of the 104th General 24Assembly have taken office a A majority vote of the members 25appointed, confirmed, and serving on the Board is required to 26approve any action, except that the 7 new Board members who   SB0116- 32 -LRB104 04019 LNS 14043 b1were appointed to fill seats of members whose terms were 2terminated on the effective date of this amendatory act of the 393rd General Assembly may vote to approve actions when 4appointed and serving. Beginning on the date when the 5 5members initially to be elected under this amendatory Act of 6the 104th General Assembly have taken office, a majority vote 7of the elected members and the members appointed, confirmed, 8and serving on the Board is required to approve any action. 9    F. Upon appointment of the 7 new Board members who were 10appointed to fill seats of members whose terms were terminated 11on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 93rd 12General Assembly, the Board shall review all of its current 13rules in an effort to streamline procedures, improve 14efficiency, and eliminate unnecessary forms and paperwork. 15(Source: P.A. 102-894, eff. 5-20-22; 103-594, eff. 6-25-24.)